Tennessee, session 114, SB2318.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-13-104, is amended by deleting
subdivision (16) and substituting instead the following:
(16) "Sponsor" means a proposed governing body filing an application for the
establishment of a public charter school that is not a:
(A) For-profit entity;
(B) Nonpublic school, as defined in § 49-6-3001; or
(C) Postsecondary institution not regionally accredited;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-13-106, is amended by deleting
subsection (c) and substituting instead the following:
(c)
(1) A nonpublic school, as defined in § 49-6-3001, shall not establish a
public charter school pursuant to this chapter.
(2) A private postsecondary institution, including a private postsecondary
institution that is religiously affiliated, that maintains a campus in this state may
establish a public charter school pursuant to this chapter.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-13-102(e), is amended by
deleting the language "the state's public higher education institutions" and substituting instead
the language "the postsecondary institutions in this state".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-13-108(i), is amended by deleting
the language "public institution of higher education" wherever it appears in the subsection and
SB2318
010694
- 1 -

substituting instead the language "postsecondary institution" and by deleting the language
"public institution of higher education's" in subdivision (2) and substituting instead the language
"postsecondary institution's".
SECTION 5. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010694